Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB746.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5669YC (7) 91 jda/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 256.7, subsection 21, paragraph b, 1 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 2 follows: 3 A set of core academic indicators in mathematics and reading 4 in grades four, eight, and eleven, a set of core academic 5 indicators in science and social studies in grades eight and 6 ten, and another set of core indicators that includes but 7 is not limited to graduation rate, postsecondary education, 8 and successful employment in Iowa. Annually, the department 9 shall report state data for each indicator in the condition of 10 education report. 11 Sec. 2. Section 256.7, subsection 21, paragraph b, 12 subparagraph (2), subparagraph divisions (a), (b), (c), and 13 (d), Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 14 (a) That all students enrolled in school districts in 15 grades three through eleven be administered an assessment in 16 mathematics and English language arts, including reading and 17 writing, during the last quarter of the school year and all 18 students enrolled in school districts in grades five, eight, 19 and ten be administered an assessment in science during the 20 last quarter of the school year the following assessments 21 during the last quarter of the school year: 22 (i) In grades three through eleven, an assessment in 23 mathematics and English language arts, including reading and 24 writing . 25 (ii) In grades five, eight, and ten, an assessment in 26 science. 27 (iii) In grades eight and ten, an assessment in social 28 studies. 29 (b) That the assessment, at a minimum, assess the core 30 academic indicators identified in this paragraph âbâ ; be 31 aligned with the Iowa common core standards in both content 32 and rigor; accurately describe student achievement and 33 growth for purposes of the school, the school district, and 34 state accountability systems; provide valid, reliable, and 35 -1- LSB 5669YC (7) 91 jda/jh 1/ 14 H.F. _____ fair measures of student progress toward college or career 1 readiness; and meet the summative assessment requirements of 2 the federal Every Student Succeeds Act, Pub. L. No. 114-95 , if 3 applicable . 4 (c) That the assessment be available for administration in 5 both paper-and-pencil and computer-based formats and include 6 assessments in mathematics, science, social studies, and 7 English language arts, including reading and writing. 8 (d) That the assessment be peer-reviewed by an independent, 9 third-party evaluator to determine that the assessment is 10 aligned with the Iowa core academic standards, provides a 11 measurement of student growth and student proficiency, and 12 meets the summative assessment requirements of the federal 13 Every Student Succeeds Act, Pub. L. No. 114-95 , if applicable . 14 The assessment developed by the Iowa testing program within the 15 university of Iowa college of education shall be adjusted as 16 necessary to meet the requirements of this subparagraph (2) as 17 determined by the peer review. 18 Sec. 3. Section 256.7, subsection 33, paragraph b, Code 19 2026, is amended to read as follows: 20 b. Adopt rules to require school districts to adopt 21 protocols for suicide prevention and postvention and the 22 identification of adverse childhood experiences and strategies 23 to mitigate toxic stress response . The protocols shall be 24 based on nationally recognized best practices. 25 Sec. 4. Section 256.9, subsection 49, paragraph b, Code 26 2026, is amended to read as follows: 27 b. Convene an advisory group comprised of education 28 stakeholders including but not limited to school district and 29 accredited nonpublic school teachers, school administrators, 30 higher education faculty who teach in the subjects for which 31 the curriculum is being adopted, private sector employers, 32 members of the boards of directors of school districts, 33 and individuals representing the educational assessment 34 providers. The task force shall review the national assessment 35 -2- LSB 5669YC (7) 91 jda/jh 2/ 14 H.F. _____ of educational progress standards and assessments used by 1 other states, and shall consider standards identified as best 2 practices in the field of study by the national councils of 3 teachers of English and mathematics, the national council for 4 the social studies, the national science teachers association, 5 and other recognized experts. 6 Sec. 5. Section 256.9, subsection 64, Code 2026, is amended 7 to read as follows: 8 64. Develop and distribute to school districts standards 9 of practice for equity coordinators employed by school 10 districts. To provide consistency in training statewide, the 11 director shall also develop and distribute to school districts 12 a training program on free speech under the first amendment 13 to the Constitution of the United States which shall be used 14 by school districts to provide training pursuant to section 15 279.75 . 16 Sec. 6. Section 256.11, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, 17 is amended to read as follows: 18 The state board shall adopt rules under chapter 17A and 19 a procedure for accrediting all public and nonpublic schools 20 in Iowa offering instruction at any or all levels from the 21 prekindergarten level through grade twelve. The rules 22 of the state board shall require that an age-appropriate , 23 multicultural, and gender-fair approach is used by schools and 24 school districts. The educational program shall be taught from 25 an age-appropriate , multicultural, and gender-fair approach. 26 Global perspectives shall be incorporated into all levels of 27 the educational program. The rules adopted by the state board 28 pursuant to section 256.17, Code Supplement 1987 , to establish 29 new standards shall satisfy the requirements of this section to 30 adopt rules to implement the educational program contained in 31 this section . The educational program shall be as follows: 32 Sec. 7. Section 256.11, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 33 to read as follows: 34 2. The kindergarten program shall include experiences 35 -3- LSB 5669YC (7) 91 jda/jh 3/ 14 H.F. _____ designed to develop healthy emotional and social habits and 1 growth in the language arts and communication skills, as well 2 as a capacity for the completion of individual tasks, and 3 protect and increase physical well-being with attention given 4 to experiences relating to the development of life skills and, 5 subject to section 279.80 , age-appropriate and research-based 6 human growth and development . A kindergarten teacher shall be 7 licensed to teach in kindergarten. An accredited nonpublic 8 school must meet the requirements of this subsection only if 9 the nonpublic school offers a kindergarten program; provided, 10 however, that section 279.80 shall not apply to a nonpublic 11 school. 12 Sec. 8. Section 256.11, subsection 3, paragraph a, 13 subparagraph (5), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 14 (5) Health. The health curriculum shall include the 15 characteristics of communicable diseases all of the following: 16 (a) The characteristics of communicable diseases . 17 (b) Physical fitness. 18 (c) Nutrition. 19 Sec. 9. Section 256.11, subsection 4, paragraph a, 20 subparagraph (5), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 21 (5) Health. The health curriculum shall include 22 age-appropriate and research-based information regarding the 23 characteristics of sexually transmitted diseases all of the 24 following: 25 (a) Age-appropriate and research-based information 26 regarding the characteristics of sexually transmitted diseases . 27 (b) Physical fitness. 28 (c) Nutrition. 29 Sec. 10. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraphs e, j, and 30 k, Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 31 e. Two additional units of mathematics. The two additional 32 units of mathematics may include instruction related to applied 33 any of the following: 34 (1) Agriculture, which may be offered and taught through 35 -4- LSB 5669YC (7) 91 jda/jh 4/ 14 H.F. _____ dedicated units of coursework or through units of coursework 1 that also meet the requirements of the coursework required 2 under paragraph âhâ , subparagraph (1), subparagraph division 3 (a). 4 (2) Applied sciences, technology, engineering, or 5 manufacturing, including transportation, distribution, 6 logistics, architecture, and construction, which may be offered 7 and taught through dedicated units of coursework or through 8 units of coursework that also meet the requirements of the 9 coursework required under paragraph âhâ , subparagraph (1), 10 subparagraph division (c). 11 (3) The state board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 12 17A to implement this paragraph. 13 j. (1) One unit of health education which . 14 (a) The one unit of health education shall include 15 instruction related to all of the following: 16 (i) Physical fitness. 17 (ii) Food and nutrition. 18 (iii) Personal health. 19 (b) The one unit of health education may include personal 20 health; food and nutrition; environmental instruction related 21 to all of the following: 22 (i) Environmental health ; safety . 23 (ii) Safety and survival skills ; consumer . 24 (iii) Consumer health ; family . 25 (iv) Family life ; age-appropriate . 26 (v) Age-appropriate and research-based human growth and 27 development that incorporates the standards established under 28 section 279.50, subsection 3 , paragraph âbâ ; substance . 29 (vi) Substance use disorder and nonuse ; emotional and 30 social health; health . 31 (vii) Health resources ; cardiopulmonary . 32 (viii) Cardiopulmonary resuscitation ; and prevention . 33 (ix) Prevention and control of disease, including 34 age-appropriate and research-based information regarding 35 -5- LSB 5669YC (7) 91 jda/jh 5/ 14 H.F. _____ sexually transmitted diseases. 1 (2) The state board , as part of accreditation standards , 2 shall adopt curriculum standards for implementing the program 3 in grades nine through twelve. 4 k. (1) One-half unit of personal finance literacy, which 5 may be offered and taught through dedicated units of coursework 6 or through units of coursework that also meet the requirements 7 of the coursework required under paragraph âaâ , âbâ , âcâ , âdâ , 8 âeâ , or âhâ . The personal finance literacy curriculum shall, at 9 a minimum, address all of the following: 10 (a) Savings, including emergency fund, purchases, and 11 wealth building. 12 (b) Understanding investments, including compound and 13 simple interest, liquidity, diversification, risk return 14 ratio, certificates of deposit, money market accounts, single 15 stocks, bonds, mutual funds, rental real estate, annuities, 16 commodities, and futures. 17 (c) Wealth building and college planning, including 18 long-term and short-term investing using tax-favored plans, 19 individual retirement accounts and payments from such accounts, 20 employer-sponsored retirement plans and investments, public and 21 private educational savings accounts, and uniform gifts and 22 transfers to minors. 23 (d) Credit and debt, including credit cards, payday 24 lending, rent-to-own transactions, debt consolidation, 25 automobile leasing, cosigning a loan, debt avoidance, and the 26 marketing of debt, especially to young people. 27 (e) Consumer awareness of the power of marketing on buying 28 decisions including zero percent interest offers; marketing 29 methods, including product positioning, advertising, brand 30 recognition, and personal selling; how to read a credit report 31 and correct inaccuracies; how to build a credit score; how to 32 develop a plan to deal with creditors and avoid bankruptcy; and 33 the federal Fair Debt Collection Practices Act , codified at 15 34 U.S.C. Â§1692 â 1692p . 35 -6- LSB 5669YC (7) 91 jda/jh 6/ 14 H.F. _____ (f) Financial responsibility and money management, 1 including creating and living on a written budget and balancing 2 a checkbook; basic rules of successful negotiating and 3 techniques; and personality or other traits regarding money. 4 (g) Insurance, risk management, income, and career 5 decisions, including career choices that fit personality styles 6 and occupational goals, job search strategies, cover letters, 7 resumes, interview techniques, payroll taxes and other income 8 withholdings, and revenue sources for federal, state, and local 9 governments. 10 (h) Different types of insurance coverage including 11 renters, homeowners, automobile, health, disability, long-term 12 care, identity theft, and life insurance; term life, cash 13 value and whole life insurance; and insurance terms such 14 as deductible, stop loss, elimination period, replacement 15 coverage, liability, and out-of-pocket. 16 (i) Buying, selling, and renting advantages and 17 disadvantages relating to real estate, including adjustable 18 rate, balloon, conventional, government-backed, reverse, and 19 seller-financed mortgages. 20 (2) Units of coursework that meet the requirements of any 21 combination of coursework required under paragraph âaâ , âbâ , 22 âcâ , âdâ , âeâ , or âhâ , and that incorporate the curriculum 23 required under subparagraph (1) , shall be deemed to satisfy the 24 offer and teach requirements of this paragraph âkâ . 25 Sec. 11. Section 256.11, subsection 9A, Code 2026, is 26 amended to read as follows: 27 9A. Beginning July 1, 2007, each school district shall 28 have a qualified guidance counselor who shall be licensed by 29 the board of educational examiners under subchapter VII, part 30 3 . Each school district shall work toward the goal of having 31 one qualified guidance counselor for every three hundred fifty 32 students enrolled in the school district. The state board 33 shall establish in rule a definition of and standards for 34 an articulated sequential kindergarten through grade twelve 35 -7- LSB 5669YC (7) 91 jda/jh 7/ 14 H.F. _____ guidance and counseling program. The program shall be designed 1 to ensure that the guidance counselor can work collaboratively 2 with students, teachers, support staff, and administrators 3 to support the curricular goals of the school by offering 4 responsive services that address the growth and development 5 needs of students and the attainment of student competencies in 6 academic , career, and social areas and career areas . 7 Sec. 12. Section 256.11, subsection 10, paragraph c, 8 subparagraph (2), unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended 9 to read as follows: 10 If, after having an opportunity to correct, if permitted, a 11 school district is found to be in noncompliance with federal 12 education laws including but not limited to the federal 13 Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965, the federal 14 Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. Â§1400 15 et seq., as amended, the federal Civil Rights Act of 1964, 16 chapter 216 , section 279.73 , or section 279.74 , the director 17 shall recommend, and the state board may shall do, one of the 18 following within thirty days of the finding of noncompliance: 19 Sec. 13. Section 256.37, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 20 to read as follows: 21 3. Students graduating from Iowaâs education system must 22 demonstrate competency in challenging subject matter, and must 23 have learned to use their minds well, so they may be prepared 24 for responsible citizenship, further learning, and productive 25 employment in a global Iowaâs economy. 26 Sec. 14. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, paragraph h, Code 27 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraphs: 28 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (02) The educational standards of 29 section 256.11, subsection 2, related to the kindergarten 30 program. 31 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (002) The educational standards of 32 section 256.11, subsection 3, paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (5), 33 related to the health curriculum. 34 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (0002) The educational standards of 35 -8- LSB 5669YC (7) 91 jda/jh 8/ 14 H.F. _____ section 256.11, subsection 4, paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (5), 1 related to the health curriculum. 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (4) The educational standards of section 3 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph âkâ , related to the personal 4 finance literacy curriculum. 5 Sec. 15. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, paragraph h, 6 subparagraph (3), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 7 (3) The educational standards established in section 8 256.11, subsection 5 , paragraph âeâ , related to the use of 9 instruction related to agriculture or applied sciences, 10 technology, engineering, or manufacturing to fulfill a portion 11 of the unit requirements related to mathematics. 12 Sec. 16. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, paragraph r, Code 13 2026, is amended to read as follows: 14 r. Be subject to and comply with the requirements of section 15 279.81 relating to prohibiting students from serving on any 16 committees that determine, or provide recommendations related 17 to, whether a material in a school library should be removed in 18 the same manner as a school district . 19 Sec. 17. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, paragraphs p, r, and 20 t, Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 21 p. Be subject to and comply with the requirements of section 22 279.81 relating to prohibiting students from serving on any 23 committees that determine, or provide recommendations related 24 to, whether a material in a school library should be removed in 25 the same manner as a school district . 26 r. Be subject to and comply with the requirements of 27 section 256.11, subsection 5 , paragraph âeâ , relating to the 28 use of instruction related to agriculture or applied sciences, 29 technology, engineering, or manufacturing to fulfill a portion 30 of the unit requirements related to mathematics in the same 31 manner as a school district. 32 t. Be subject to and comply with the requirements of section 33 256.11 relating to the human growth and development curriculum 34 for grades five through eight , and the health curriculum for 35 -9- LSB 5669YC (7) 91 jda/jh 9/ 14 H.F. _____ grades nine through twelve , in the same manner as a school 1 district . 2 Sec. 18. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 3 by adding the following new paragraphs: 4 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0q. Be subject to and comply with the 5 requirements of section 256.11, subsection 2, relating to the 6 kindergarten program in the same manner as a school district. 7 NEW PARAGRAPH . 00q. Be subject to and comply with the 8 requirements of section 256.11, subsection 3, paragraph âaâ , 9 subparagraph (5), relating to the health curriculum in the same 10 manner as a school district. 11 NEW PARAGRAPH . 000q. Be subject to and comply with the 12 requirements of section 256.11, subsection 4, paragraph âaâ , 13 subparagraph (5), relating to the health curriculum in the same 14 manner as a school district. 15 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0s. Be subject to and comply with the 16 requirements of section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph âkâ , 17 relating to the personal finance literacy curriculum in the 18 same manner as a school district. 19 Sec. 19. STATE MANDATE FUNDING SPECIFIED. In accordance 20 with section 25B.2, subsection 3, the state cost of requiring 21 compliance with any state mandate included in this Act shall 22 be paid by a school district from state school foundation aid 23 received by the school district under section 257.16. This 24 specification of the payment of the state cost shall be deemed 25 to meet all of the state funding-related requirements of 26 section 25B.2, subsection 3, and no additional state funding 27 shall be necessary for the full implementation of this Act 28 by and enforcement of this Act against all affected school 29 districts. 30